Mississippi, session 2026, HB1453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This act shall be known as the Maternal Health Monitoring Pilot Program. (2)  Definitions.  As used in this act, the following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall be defined as provided in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Department" means the State Department of Health. (b)  "Eligible participant" means a patient who meets all of the following criteria: (i)  The patient is a recipient of medical assistance; (ii)  The patient is a member of a participating managed care organization; and (iii)  The patient is pregnant. (c)  "Escalation pathway" means an agreement between the participating managed care organizations and the technology vendor on a process to follow when an eligible participant's measurements are concerning and warrant further review and investigation. (d)  "Health care provider" means an obstetrician or maternal fetal medicine physician who meet all of the following criteria: (i)  Is licensed in Mississippi; (ii)  Is in-network of the participating managed care organizations; and (iii)  Cares for an eligible participant during pregnancy. (e) "Participating managed care organizations" means the managed care organizations selected by the department to administer the pilot program. (f)  "Pilot program" means the Maternal Health Monitoring Pilot Program. (g)  "Remote monitoring clinical care team" means a team of nurses who are licensed in Mississippi and dietitians who are monitoring eligible participants' measurements.  The team also provides nutrition guidance, diabetes and hypertension condition management counseling and pregnancy and postpartum advice. (h)  "Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes" means technology provided by the technology vendor that: (i)  Collects health data from an eligible participant and electronically transmits that information securely for interpretation and recommendation; (ii)  Uses devices that are authorized by the United States Food and Drug Administration; (iii)  Monitors health data, including blood pressure, weight, blood glucose levels, or other physiological health data as determined by the eligible participant's health care provider; (iv)  Transmits health data through cellular networks; and (v)  Provides preprogrammed equipment specifically for each eligible participant. (i)  "Technology vendor" means the technology company selected by the department to contract with the participating managed care organizations in administering the pilot program. (3)  Establishment of pilot program.  The Maternal Health Monitoring Pilot Program is established within the department to offer eligible participants improved maternal health care through remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes. (4)  Administration of pilot program.  (a)  The department shall select one or more participating managed care organizations and one (1) technology vendor to administer the pilot program in a manner determined by the department. (b)  The participating managed care organizations shall: (i)  Contract directly with a technology vendor to offer remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes; and (ii)  Ensure that eligible participants have access to the pilot program. (5)  Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes requirements. The technology vendor shall meet the following requirements when offering remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes to an eligible participant under the pilot program: (a)  Ensure that remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes is possible during pregnancy and for up to three (3) months postpartum; (b)  Ensure that remote patient monitoring devices are delivered to the eligible participant; (c)  Ensure that the eligible participant has a process to be trained on how to use the remote patient monitoring devices; (d)  Assign a program manager to support implementation and administration of the program and to coordinate efforts with the participating managed care organizations and the department; and (e)  Employ a remote monitoring clinical care team that is capable of the following: (i)  Monitoring and reviewing eligible participant's health data; (ii)  Creating an escalation pathway with the participating managed care organizations if the eligible participant's remote patient monitoring readings, in conjunction with the eligible participant's symptoms, require additional medical attention; (iii)  Providing health coaching to participants in matters including nutrition, condition management, and healthy behavior modification; and (iv)  Coordinating with the eligible participant's health care provider as needed. (6)  Operation of pilot program.  (a)  The department shall implement the pilot program in as many counties as necessary to ensure participation of up to three hundred (300) eligible participants. (b)  The pilot program shall be operational no later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the contract date between the participating managed care organization and the technology vendor. (c)  The pilot program shall conclude two (2) years after the program is operational. (7)  Report.  (a) Within two (2) years after the pilot program's implementation, the department shall collaborate with the participating managed care organizations and any other relevant stakeholders to develop a report on evaluating the outcomes of the pilot program. (b)  The report shall include recommendations regarding whether the pilot program should be expanded throughout Mississippi. (c)  The department shall submit the report to all of the following: (i)  The Governor; (ii)  The Lieutenant Governor; (iii)  The Speaker of the House; (iv)  The Chairs and Vice Chairs of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee, the House Medicaid Committee, the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee, and the Senate Medicaid Committee. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.